Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part VII Administration

7-11-701.
Administration.

This chapter is administered by the director. The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it deems sufficient for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums appropriated or so much of them as is from time to time required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director. All sums received by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter are deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 36.

7-11-702.
Prohibitions on use of information.

Neither the director nor an employee of the director may use, for personal gain or benefit, information filed with or obtained by the director that is not public information, nor may the director or an employee of the director conduct securities dealings based on information filed with or obtained by the director, even though public, if there has not been a sufficient period for the securities markets to assimilate the information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-703.
Public information — Confidentiality.

Except as provided in subsection (b), information and documents filed with or obtained by the director are public information and are available for public examination under the open records law of the state.

The following information and documents do not constitute public information under subsection (a):

Information or documents obtained by the director in connection with an investigation under §

7-11-601

; and

Information or documents filed with the director in connection with a registration statement under part III or a report under §

7-11-209

, which constitute trade secrets or commercial or financial information of a person for which that person is entitled to and has asserted a claim of confidentiality or privilege authorized by law.

The director may disclose:

Information obtained in connection with an investigation under §

7-11-601(a)

to the extent provided in §

7-11-601(b)

subject to the restrictions of subsection (b)(2) of this section; and

Information obtained in connection with an investigation under §

7-11-601(a)

, if disclosure is for the purpose of a civil, administrative, or criminal investigation or proceeding by a securities agency, law enforcement agency, or administrator specified in §

7-11-704(a)

, and the receiving agency or administrator represents, in writing, that under the applicable law protections exist to preserve the integrity, confidentiality, and security of the information.

This chapter does not create any privilege or derogate any privilege existing at common law, by statute, rule, or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-704.
Cooperation with other agencies.

To encourage uniform interpretation and administration of this chapter and effective securities regulation and enforcement, the director may cooperate with the securities agencies or administrators of one or more states, Canadian provinces or territories, or another country, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the Securities Investor Protection Corporation, any self-regulatory organization, any national or international organization of securities officials or agencies, and any governmental law enforcement or regulatory agency.

The cooperation authorized by subsection (a) includes, but is not limited to, the following actions:

Establishing a central depository for licensing or registration under this chapter and for documents or records required or allowed to be maintained under this chapter;

Making a joint license or registration examination or investigation;

Holding a joint administrative hearing;

Filing and prosecuting a joint civil or administrative proceeding;

Sharing and exchanging personnel;

Sharing and exchanging information and documents subject to the restrictions of applicable state law; and

Formulating, in accordance with the administrative procedure act of this state, rules or proposed rules on matters such as statements of policy, guidelines, and interpretive opinions and releases.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-705.
Rules, forms, and orders.

In addition to specific authority otherwise granted by this chapter, the director:

Shall adopt rules of practice describing the nature and requirements of all formal and informal procedures available to the public, including a description of all forms and instructions that are to be used by persons dealing with the director;

May adopt rules, in addition to those otherwise required by this chapter embodying appropriate standards, principles, and procedural safeguards that the director applies in the administration of this chapter; and

May adopt rules defining any term, whether or not used in this chapter, insofar as the definition is not inconsistent with this chapter.

To keep rules adopted by the director in harmony with the regulations adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission under the federal securities laws and to encourage uniformity with the rules of securities agencies and administrators in other states, the director, insofar as is consistent with this chapter, shall take into consideration the regulations adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission and the rules of securities agencies and administrators in other states that enact a law comparable to this chapter.

Unless specifically provided in this chapter to the contrary, no rule or order may be adopted, amended, or repealed unless the director determines that the action is:

In the public interest and appropriate for the protection of investors; and

Consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of this chapter.

The director may use his or her own experience, technical competence, specialized knowledge, and judgment in the adoption of a rule.

The director may by rule or order prescribe:

The form and content of financial statements required under this chapter;

The circumstances under which consolidated financial statements must be filed; and

Whether a required financial statement must be certified and by whom. Unless the director provides otherwise by rule or order, a financial statement required under this chapter must be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles or other accounting principles as are prescribed for the issuer of the financial statement by the Securities and Exchange Commission.

The director shall file in the office of the secretary of state and in the director’s office each rule adopted or amended and all rules existing on July 12, 1990 that have not been previously filed. The filing must be done as soon after adoption or amendment of the rule as is practicable. The director shall affix to each rule a certificate of the time and date of filing and keep a permanent register open to public inspection of all fixed rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-706.
Declaratory orders and rulings.

Any person may petition the director for a declaratory order as to the applicability to specified circumstances of a statute, rule, or order under this chapter. The director may issue a declaratory order in response to a petition for that order unless the director determines that the petition fails to comply with the director’s rules or, if the order was issued, would substantially prejudice the rights of a person who would be a necessary party and does not consent to the determination of the matter by a declaratory order.

The director, upon application by an interested party, may conduct a hearing and issue a declaratory ruling as to the applicability of this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter to a person, security or transaction, or as to the meaning of a term used in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-707.
Good faith reliance.

No provision of this chapter imposing liability applies to an act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with:

A rule or order adopted by the director, notwithstanding that the rule or order is later amended, repealed, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid; or

A declaratory order or ruling issued by the director under §

7-11-706

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-708.
Consent to service of process.

An applicant for licensing or registration under this chapter, a federal covered adviser or an issuer who proposes to offer securities in this state through a person acting on an agency basis in the common law sense shall file with the director, in the form the director, by rule, prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the director the person’s attorney to receive service of lawful process in a noncriminal proceeding against the person, a successor, or personal representative that arises under this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter after the consent is filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent.

A person who has filed a consent complying with subsection (a) in connection with a previous application for licensing or registration need not file an additional consent.

If a person, including a nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or a rule or order of the director under this chapter and the person has not filed a consent to service of process under subsection (a), the engaging in the conduct constitutes the appointment of the director as the person’s attorney to receive service of lawful process in a noncriminal proceeding against the person, a successor, or personal representative that grows out of the conduct.

A consent to service filed on behalf of an issuer organized or domiciled under the laws of a foreign country whose securities are being offered in this state otherwise than by or through underwriters, must be accompanied by an opinion of counsel stating that judgments of United States courts will be recognized by the courts of the country in which the issuer was organized or is domiciled.

Service under subsection (a) or (c) may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the director, but it is not effective unless:

The plaintiff, who may be the director, promptly sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the defendant or respondent at the address stated in the consent to service of process or, if no consent to service of process has been filed, at the last known address or takes other steps that are reasonably calculated to give actual notice; and

The plaintiff files an affidavit of compliance with this subsection in the proceeding on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within a further time that the court, or the director in a proceeding before the director, allows.

Service as provided in subsection (e) may be used in a proceeding before the director or by the director in a proceeding in which the director is the moving party.

If the process is served under subsection (e), the court, or the director in a proceeding before the director, orders continuances that are necessary to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-709.
Administrative files and records.

The director keeps one or more registers of:

All applications for licensing and registration under this chapter;

All licenses and registration statements that become effective under this chapter;

All disciplinary and enforcement orders issued and reports of investigation made under this chapter;

All declaratory orders and rulings issued under this chapter; and

All other orders issued under this chapter.

The director maintains records consistent with applicable law.

All records required to be maintained by subsections (a) and (b) may be maintained in computer or microfilm format or any other form of data storage.

Upon request, the director shall certify under the seal of office a copy as being a true and correct copy of the records maintained by the office. The director may establish by rule reasonable charges for furnishing or certifying copies. In an investigation or proceeding under this chapter, a copy so certified is prima facie evidence of the contents of the records certified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-710.
Administrative proceedings.

The director may commence an administrative proceeding under this chapter by entering a notice of intent to do a contemplated act. The notice of intent may be entered without notice, without opportunity for hearing, and need not be supported by findings of fact or conclusions of law, but must be in writing.

Upon entry of a notice of intent, the director promptly notifies, in writing, all parties against whom action is contemplated that the notice has been entered together with a brief statement of reasons for the entry of the notice of intent. The director sends to all parties against whom action is contemplated a notice of opportunity for hearing on the matters described in the notice of intent. The director, upon receipt of a written request within thirty (30) days of the entry of the notice of intent, shall set the matter for hearing no more than sixty (60) nor less than twenty (20) days from the receipt of the request for hearing and shall promptly notify the parties of the time and place for hearing.

The director, whether or not a written request for a hearing is received from any interested party, may set the matter down for hearing on the director’s own motion.

The director may by order take the action contemplated in the notice of intent:

Thirty (30) days after the parties against whom action is contemplated receive notice of the right to request a hearing if that person fails to request a hearing; or

One day following the date set for a hearing requested by a party if the party fails to appear at the hearing.

If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director, after notice of the opportunity for hearing to all persons against whom action is contemplated, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination.

For the purpose of conducting any hearing as provided in this section, the director has the power to call any party to testify under oath at hearings, to require the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, records, and papers and to take the depositions of witnesses; and for that purpose the director is authorized, at the request of the person requesting a hearing or upon his or her own initiative, to issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records, or papers.

A party entitled to a hearing under this section may appear on his or her own behalf or may be represented by an attorney. A party has the right to present all relevant evidence and to examine all opposing witnesses who appear on any matter relevant to the issues.

Upon written request to another party, any party is entitled to:

Obtain the names and addresses of witnesses who will or may be called by the other party to testify at the hearing; and

Inspect and copy any documents or items that the other party will or may introduce in evidence at the hearing.

The director passes upon the admissibility of evidence and may exclude evidence that is incompetent, irrelevant, immaterial, and unduly repetitious.

The director may conduct the hearing, or the director may appoint a hearing officer to conduct the hearing. A hearing officer has the same powers and authority in conducting a hearing as the director. The hearing officer shall be admitted to the practice of law in this state and be possessed of any additional qualifications that the director requires. The director may direct the hearing officer to submit to the director a written report stating proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law and a recommendation of the action to be taken by the director. The director may order additional testimony to be taken or permit the introduction of further documentary evidence.

A final order or order after hearing including entry of written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-711.
Provisions applicable to administrative proceedings.

All actions of the director including administrative proceedings, adoption of rules, and issuance of orders are governed by the state administrative procedures act, except that:

The issue of a stop order under §

7-11-303(e)

is governed by §

7-11-303(e)

;

The issue of an order pursuant to an emergency administrative proceeding is governed by §

7-11-712

; and

The issue of a declaratory order or ruling is governed by §

7-11-706

.

All rules and orders issued under this chapter are subject to judicial review in accordance with the state administrative procedures act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-712.
Emergency administrative proceedings.

The director may use emergency administrative proceedings in a situation involving an immediate danger to the public welfare requiring immediate action.

The director may take only the action that is necessary to prevent or avoid the immediate danger to the public welfare that justifies use of emergency administrative proceedings.

The director shall issue an order, including a brief statement of findings of fact, conclusions of law, and, if it is an exercise of the agency’s discretion, policy reasons for the decision to justify the determination of an immediate danger and the director’s decision to take the specific action.

The director shall give the notice that is practicable to persons who are required to comply with the order. The order is effective when issued. Upon the entry of an order under subsection (c), the director will promptly give notice to the persons subject to the order:

That the order has been entered, together with a brief statement of the reasons for the entry of the order; and

That the director, upon receipt of a written request within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order, shall set the matter for hearing no more than sixty (60) nor less than twenty (20) days from the receipt of the request for hearing and shall promptly notify the parties of the time and place for hearing. If no hearing is requested and none is ordered by the director, the order becomes permanent on the thirtieth day after its entry and remains in effect unless or until it is modified or vacated by the director.

If a party fails to appear at a hearing, the order becomes permanent one day following the date set for a hearing requested by a party.

After issuing an order under this section, the director shall proceed as quickly as feasible to complete proceedings that would be required under the state administrative procedures act if the matter did not involve an immediate danger.

The record of the director consists of the documents regarding the matter that were considered or prepared by the director. The director shall maintain these documents as the official record.

Unless otherwise required by law, the director’s record need not constitute the exclusive basis for the director’s action in emergency administrative proceedings or for judicial review of the action.

An order issued under this section is subject to judicial review in accordance with the requirements of the state administrative procedures act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.